Delaware, session 153, HB248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 8603, Title 9 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8603. Quarterly payments. Tax payments. The receiver of taxes and county treasurer or director of finance of any county may accept payment of all taxes due and payable on real estate on a quarterly or monthly basis. This section shall not apply with respect to New Castle County.